California, session 20252026, AB638.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 10566 is added to the Water Code, immediately following Section 10565, to read:10566. (a) On or before December 1, 2026, the board shall develop recommendations for stormwater capture and use for the irrigation of urban public lands for the purpose of providing guidance. The recommendations shall address, but not be limited to, both of the following:(1) Opportunities for use of captured stormwater for irrigation to offset potable water demand in a manner that poses minimal to no public health risks.(2) Recommendations for pathogens and pathogen indicators, total suspended solids, toxics, and structural and nonstructural best management practices to reduce potential health risks.(b) The board shall solicit and receive written public comment on the proposed recommendations described in subdivision (a). The board shall approve the final recommendations described in subdivision (a) following the completion of a public hearing. (b)(c) “Urban public lands” as used in this section means land in an urban area that is owned by the state, a city, or a county, or land that has been dedicated for public access, including, but not limited to, parks, street medians and parkways, and golf courses.